Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB705.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2816. Development of grid infrastructure.(a) Coordination.--The commission shall ensure adequate coordination among electric distribution companies to prepare this Commonwealth for the grid capacity and resilience needed to ensure the reliable and secure operation of the grid in response to increased demand from quickly growing industries.(b) Guidelines.--No later than 180 days after the effective date of this section, the commission shall issue guidelines for electric distribution companies to prepare infrastructure development plans to promote grid security and improve the resilience and reliability of the grid while addressing growing 123456789101112131415161718 demand. The plan shall address all of the following:(1) The establishment of a secure, resilient grid network capable of withstanding cyber and physical threats, as well as any capacity expansion or other modification required to maintain reliability and meet demand from new and growing sectors, including transportation electrification.(2) The electrification of critical public infrastructure, including public transit, emergency services and governmental fleets, to enhance the resilience and recovery capabilities of this Commonwealth, specific inclusion of long-term projects and plans for increases in demand from emerging industries, including increased electric vehicles designed for light, medium and heavy duty, data centers and other large load customers.(3) Deployment of grid modernization technologies, including energy storage systems, microgrids, electric vehicle charging stations and advanced metering infrastructure to improve grid security and resilience.(4) Requirements to ensure that electric distribution company development plans are implemented in a competitive and nondiscriminatory manner with opportunities for third-party security vendors and technology providers.(5) Open standard communication protocols for grid operations and system interoperability to enhance security against cyber threats.(6) Policies to ensure grid infrastructure is deployed in underserved and high-risk areas vulnerable to grid disruptions.(c) Grid infrastructure development plans.--(1) An electric distribution company shall, consistent 20250HB0705PN0724 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with the guidelines issued under subsection (b), file an application for approval of a grid infrastructure development plan with the commission within one year of the effective date of this section.(2) The plan shall:(i) Describe the electric distribution company's proposal to ensure the resilience, security and reliability of the grid while meeting Federal and State energy security standards.(ii) Include strategies to optimize grid performance, including demand management, distributed generation integration, deployment of infrastructure to support transportation electrification and advanced cybersecurity measures.(iii) Include an evaluation of the impact that implementation of the plan will have on the following:(A) Increased grid security and reliability, particularly in areas where critical infrastructure is located.(B) The expansion and strengthening of the transmission and distribution network to withstand physical and cyber threats.(C) The expansion and strengthening of the transmission and distribution network to meet electricity demand from new and growing sources, including an evaluation of public electric vehicle charging infrastructure and vehicle adoption rates.(D) Economic activity and economic development within the public utility's service territory, including capital investments, the direct or indirect 20250HB0705PN0724 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 creation of jobs and additions to the tax base of this Commonwealth.(E) The rates charged to the bundled retail customers of the public utility.(F) The financial risk to customers of the public utility, including impacts on low-income ratepayers.(3) The electric distribution company shall develop the plan in consultation with all of the following:(i) The Department of Transportation.(ii) The Department of Environmental Protection.(iii) The Pennsylvania Emergency Management Agency.(iv) Local and regional governments and representatives of underserved communities within the electric distribution company's service territory.(v) Experts in grid security and resilience.(vi) Any other pertinent group or entity determined by the electric distribution company or the commission.(d) Approval criteria.--When considering an application for approval under subsection (c), the commission shall consider all of the following:(1) Whether the investments, programs and expenditures are reasonably expected to improve the public utility's system efficiency, security and operational flexibility.(2) Whether the investments, programs and expenditures increase the resilience and security of critical infrastructure.(3) Whether the investments, programs and expenditures position the electric distribution company to meet and enable increasing electricity demand from transportation 20250HB0705PN0724 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electrification and other growing sectors.(4) Whether the costs of the investments, programs and expenditures are reasonably mitigated through the utilization of available Federal and State security incentives and funding programs, including direct and indirect grants.(5) Whether the investments, programs and expenditures support private capital investments and skilled jobs in related security services.(6) Whether the investments, programs and expenditures are transparent and incorporate public reporting requirements.(e) Plan approval or disapproval.--(1) The commission shall, after reasonable notice and hearing and within 180 days of submission of an application under subsection (c), approve or disapprove the grid infrastructure development plan.(2) If the commission does not approve the plan, the commission shall describe in detail the reasons for the disapproval, and the electric distribution company may file, within 60 days, a revised plan to address the deficiencies.(3) The commission shall approve or disapprove the revised plan within 60 days of receipt.(f) Additional plans.--An electric distribution company shall file an updated grid infrastructure development plan five years after the initial approval of the plan.(g) Recovery of costs.--A public utility that engages in measures to enhance grid security infrastructure in accordance with a plan approved under subsection (e) may recover the public utility's reasonable costs through a commission-approved tariff rider or base rate.20250HB0705PN0724 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Grid security." The protection of the electrical grid from physical, cyber and operational threats to ensure continuous reliable service."Transportation electrification." The use of electricity to power vehicles."Underserved community." A community that meets any of the following criteria:(1) Qualified census tracts with high poverty rates or public health concerns.(2) Public school zones with a high percentage of students eligible for free or reduced-price meals.(3) Areas vulnerable to significant grid disruptions or security threats.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0705PN0724 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617